Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.250

Acquisition of water rights—District property need not be contiguous.

One local improvement district may be established for any or all of the purposes embraced herein even though the area assessed for such purposes may not coincide or be contiguous: PROVIDED, That whenever the legislative body of the city or town decides to construct a special improvement in a distribution system, a separate local improvement district may be formed for such portion and bonds may be issued therefor as provided in the general local improvement law.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.92.250. Prior: 1915 c 112 s 4; RRS s 9498. Formerly RCW 80.40.250.]

NOTES:

Creation of local improvement districts: Chapter 35.43 RCW.

Issuance of bonds to pay for local improvements: Chapters 35.45, 35.48 RCW.